Connecticut, session 2026, SB00285.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027, and applicable to taxable
years commencing on or after January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Activities of daily living" means basic personal everyday
activities, including, but not limited to, ambulating, feeding, dressing,
personal hygiene, continence and toileting.
(2) "Eligible expenditure" means (A) the improvement or alteration to
the family caregiver's or eligible family member's primary residence to
permit the eligible family member to live in the residence and to remain
mobile, safe and independent, (B) the family caregiver's purchase or
lease of equipment, including, but not limited to, durable medical
equipment that is necessary to assist an eligible family member in
carrying out one or more activities of daily living, and (C) other paid or
incurred expenses by the family caregiver that assist the family
caregiver in providing care to an eligible family member, including, but
not limited to, expenditures related to (i) hiring a home health aide, (ii)
LCO 1454 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 285
respite care, (iii) adult day care, (iv) personal care attendants, (v) health
care equipment, and (vi) technology. "Eligible expenditure" does not
include general household maintenance activities, including, but not
limited to, painting, plumbing, electrical repairs and exterior
maintenance.
(3) "Eligible family member" means a person who (A) requires
assistance with at least two activities of daily living, as certified in
writing by a licensed health care provider, as defined in section 19a-106a
of the general statutes, (B) qualifies as a dependent, spouse, parent or
other relation by blood or marriage to the family caregiver, and (C) lives
in a private residential home and not in a long-term care facility, as
defined in section 19a-535e of the general statutes.
(4) "Family caregiver" means a person who (A) provides care and
support for an eligible family member, (B) has a federal adjusted gross
income of less than fifty thousand dollars for an individual and less than
one hundred thousand dollars for a couple filing jointly, and (C) has
personally incurred uncompensated expenses directly related to the
care of an eligible family member.
(b) (1) There shall be allowed, for the taxable years commencing on
or after January 1, 2027, a credit against the tax imposed by chapter 229
of the general statutes, other than the liability imposed by section 12-707
of the general statutes, for eligible expenditures incurred by a family
caregiver for the care and support of an eligible family member.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed shall be fifty per cent of the
eligible expenditures incurred by such family caregiver in a taxable year
and shall not exceed two thousand dollars for any taxable year. If two
or more family caregivers claim the credit authorized by this section for
the same eligible family member, the maximum allowable credit shall
be allocated in equal amounts between each of the family caregivers.
(c) (1) The Department of Revenue Services shall administer a system
of tax credit vouchers within the resources, requirements and purposes
of this section. An eligible family member may apply to the
LCO 1454 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 285
Commissioner of Revenue Services, in a form and manner prescribed by
the commissioner, for a tax credit voucher in an amount as provided in
this section. The application shall contain such information the
commissioner deems necessary to administer the provisions of this
section.
(2) The commissioner shall approve applications on a first-come,
first-served basis and shall notify an applicant in writing not later than
thirty days after the date of receipt of an application of the
commissioner's approval or rejection of the application.
(3) The total amount of tax credit vouchers that may be issued under
this section shall not exceed one million eight hundred thousand dollars
in any one taxable year.
(d) Any credit allowed under this section shall be nonrefundable.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027, and New section
applicable to taxable years
commencing on or after
January 1, 2027
AGE Joint Favorable C/R FIN
LCO 1454 3 of 3